Illinois, session 104th, HB1627.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-12020 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12020)7    Sec. 5-12020. Commercial wind energy facilities and 8commercial solar energy facilities. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 11solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 12Property Tax Code. "Commercial solar energy facility" does not 13mean a utility-scale solar energy facility being constructed 14at a site that was eligible to participate in a procurement 15event conducted by the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to 16subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 17Act. 18    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 19conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 20total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 21facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 22an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or 23municipality before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of   HB1627- 2 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1Public Act 102-1123).2    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 3ownership interest in a commercial wind energy facility or a 4commercial solar energy facility, or both, regardless of 5whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 6rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 7construction and operation of the facility, and (ii) at the 8time the facility is being developed, a person who is acting as 9a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 10permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 11operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 12will own or operate the facility.13    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 14not a participating property.15    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 16located on nonparticipating property and that is existing and 17occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 18develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 19solar energy facility is filed with the county.20    "Occupied community building" means any one or more of the 21following buildings that is existing and occupied on the date 22that the application for a permit to develop the commercial 23wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 24is filed with the county: a school, place of worship, day care 25facility, public library, or community center.26    "Participating property" means real property that is the   HB1627- 3 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 2the owner of the real property that provides the facility 3owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 4property for the purpose of constructing a commercial wind 5energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 6supporting facilities. "Participating property" also includes 7real property that is owned by a facility owner for the purpose 8of constructing a commercial wind energy facility, a 9commercial solar energy facility, or supporting facilities.10    "Participating residence" means a residence that is 11located on participating property and that is existing and 12occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 13develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 14solar energy facility is filed with the county.15    "Protected lands" means real property that is: 16        (1) subject to a permanent conservation right 17    consistent with the Real Property Conservation Rights Act; 18    or 19        (2) registered or designated as a nature preserve, 20    buffer, or land and water reserve under the Illinois 21    Natural Areas Preservation Act. 22    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 23substations, access roads, meteorological towers, storage 24containers, and equipment associated with the generation and 25storage of electricity by the commercial wind energy facility 26or commercial solar energy facility.  HB1627- 4 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1    "Wind tower" includes the wind turbine tower, nacelle, and 2blades. 3    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether 4the county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 5zoning under Section 5-12007, a county may establish standards 6for commercial wind energy facilities, commercial solar energy 7facilities, or both. The standards may include all of the 8requirements specified in this Section but may not include 9requirements for commercial wind energy facilities or 10commercial solar energy facilities that are more restrictive 11than specified in this Section. A county may also regulate the 12siting of commercial wind energy facilities with standards 13that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 14in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 15outside the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality and that are 16outside the 1.5-mile radius surrounding the zoning 17jurisdiction of a municipality. 18    (c) If a county has elected to establish standards under 19subsection (b), before the county grants siting approval or a 20special use permit for a commercial wind energy facility or a 21commercial solar energy facility, or modification of an 22approved siting or special use permit, the county board of the 23county in which the facility is to be sited or the zoning board 24of appeals for the county shall hold at least one public 25hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance 26with the Open Meetings Act and shall be held not more than 60   HB1627- 5 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1days after the filing of the application for the facility. The 2county shall allow interested parties to a special use permit 3an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine 4witnesses at the hearing, but the county may impose reasonable 5restrictions on the public hearing, including reasonable time 6limitations on the presentation of evidence and the 7cross-examination of witnesses. The county shall also allow 8public comment at the public hearing in accordance with the 9Open Meetings Act. The county shall make its siting and 10permitting decisions not more than 30 days after the 11conclusion of the public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall 12be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 13county. A facility owner must enter into an agricultural 14impact mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture 15prior to the date of the required public hearing. A commercial 16wind energy facility owner seeking an extension of a permit 17granted by a county prior to July 24, 2015 (the effective date 18of Public Act 99-132) must enter into an agricultural impact 19mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture prior 20to a decision by the county to grant the permit extension. 21Counties may allow test wind towers or test solar energy 22systems to be sited without formal approval by the county 23board.24    (d) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 25with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to be in 26compliance with this Section within 120 days after January 27,   HB1627- 6 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b12023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123).2    (e) A county may require: 3        (1) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 4    to be sited as follows, with setback distances measured 5    from the center of the base of the wind tower:  6Setback Description           Setback Distance 7Occupied Community            2.1 times the maximum blade tip8Buildings                     height of the wind tower to the9                              nearest point on the outside10                              wall of the structure 11Participating Residences      1.1 times the maximum blade tip12                              height of the wind tower to the13                              nearest point on the outside14                              wall of the structure 15Nonparticipating Residences   2.1 times the maximum blade tip16                              height of the wind tower to the17                              nearest point on the outside18                              wall of the structure 19Boundary Lines of             None20Participating Property    HB1627- 7 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1Boundary Lines of             1.1 times the maximum blade tip2Nonparticipating Property     height of the wind tower to the3                              nearest point on the property4                              line of the nonparticipating5                              property 6Public Road Rights-of-Way     1.1 times the maximum blade tip7                              height of the wind tower8                              to the center point of the9                              public road right-of-way 10Overhead Communication and    1.1 times the maximum blade tip11Electric Transmission         height of the wind tower to the12and Distribution Facilities   nearest edge of the property13(Not Including Overhead       line, easement, or 14Utility Service Lines to      right-of-way 15Individual Houses or          containing the overhead line16Outbuildings) 17Overhead Utility Service      None18Lines to Individual19Houses or Outbuildings 20Fish and Wildlife Areas       2.1 times the maximum blade21and Illinois Nature           tip height of the wind tower22Preserve Commission           to the nearest point on the  HB1627- 8 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1Protected Lands               property line of the fish and2                              wildlife area or protected3                              land4    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with 5    electric facility clearances approved or required by the 6    National Electrical Code, the The National Electrical 7    Safety Code, the Illinois Commerce Commission, and the 8    Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and their designees 9    or successors; . 10        (2) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 11    to be sited so that industry standard computer modeling 12    indicates that any occupied community building or 13    nonparticipating residence will not experience more than 14    30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned 15    operating conditions;16        (3) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited as 17    follows, with setback distances measured from the nearest 18    edge of any component of the facility:  19Setback Description           Setback Distance 20Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest21Buildings and Dwellings on    point on the outside wall 22Nonparticipating Properties   of the structure 23Boundary Lines of             None  HB1627- 9 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1Participating Property     2Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest3                              edge 4Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest5Nonparticipating Property     point on the property6                              line of the nonparticipating7                              property 8        (4) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 9    that the facility's perimeter is enclosed by fencing 10    having a height of at least 6 feet and no more than 25 11    feet; and 12        (5) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 13    that no component of a solar panel has a height of more 14    than 20 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's 15    arrays are at full tilt. 16    The requirements set forth in this subsection (e) may be 17waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 18affected nonparticipating property.19    (f) A county may not set a sound limitation for wind towers 20in commercial wind energy facilities or any components in 21commercial solar energy facilities that is more restrictive 22than the sound limitations established by the Illinois 23Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900,   HB1627- 10 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1901, and 910.2    (g) A county may not place any restriction on the 3installation or use of a commercial wind energy facility or a 4commercial solar energy facility unless it adopts an ordinance 5that complies with this Section. A county may not establish 6siting standards for supporting facilities that preclude 7development of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial 8solar energy facilities. 9    A request for siting approval or a special use permit for a 10commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 11facility, or modification of an approved siting or special use 12permit, shall be approved if the request is in compliance with 13the standards and conditions imposed in this Act, the zoning 14ordinance adopted consistent with this Code, and the 15conditions imposed under State and federal statutes and 16regulations. 17    (h) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 18disallow, permanently or temporarily, commercial wind energy 19facilities or commercial solar energy facilities from being 20developed or operated in any district zoned to allow 21agricultural or industrial uses. 22    (i) A county may not require permit application fees for a 23commercial wind energy facility or commercial solar energy 24facility that are unreasonable. All application fees imposed 25by the county shall be consistent with fees for projects in the 26county with similar capital value and cost.   HB1627- 11 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1    (j) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a county 2shall not require standards for construction, decommissioning, 3or deconstruction of a commercial wind energy facility or 4commercial solar energy facility or related financial 5assurances that are more restrictive than those included in 6the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 7agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 8standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 9version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 102022. The amount of any decommissioning payment shall be in 11accordance with the financial assurance required by those 12agricultural impact mitigation agreements. 13    (j-5) A commercial wind energy facility or a commercial 14solar energy facility shall file a farmland drainage plan with 15the county and impacted drainage districts outlining how 16surface and subsurface drainage of farmland will be restored 17during and following construction or deconstruction of the 18facility. The plan is to be created independently by the 19facility developer and shall include the location of any 20potentially impacted drainage district facilities to the 21extent this information is publicly available from the county 22or the drainage district, plans to repair any subsurface 23drainage affected during construction or deconstruction using 24procedures outlined in the agricultural impact mitigation 25agreement entered into by the commercial wind energy facility 26owner or commercial solar energy facility owner, and   HB1627- 12 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1procedures for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 2affected during construction or deconstruction. All surface 3and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 4practicable. 5    (k) A county may not condition approval of a commercial 6wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on a 7property value guarantee and may not require a facility owner 8to pay into a neighboring property devaluation escrow account. 9    (l) A county may require certain vegetative screening 10surrounding a commercial wind energy facility or commercial 11solar energy facility but may not require earthen berms or 12similar structures. 13    (m) A county may set blade tip height limitations for wind 14towers in commercial wind energy facilities but may not set a 15blade tip height limitation that is more restrictive than the 16height allowed under a Determination of No Hazard to Air 17Navigation by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 18Part 77.19    (n) A county may require that a commercial wind energy 20facility owner or commercial solar energy facility owner 21provide:22        (1) the results and recommendations from consultation 23    with the Illinois Department of Natural Resources that are 24    obtained through the Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool 25    (EcoCAT) or a comparable successor tool; and26        (2) the results of the United States Fish and Wildlife   HB1627- 13 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1    Service's Information for Planning and Consulting 2    environmental review or a comparable successor tool that 3    is consistent with (i) the "U.S. Fish and Wildlife 4    Service's Land-Based Wind Energy Guidelines" and (ii) any 5    applicable United States Fish and Wildlife Service solar 6    wildlife guidelines that have been subject to public 7    review. 8    (o) A county may require a commercial wind energy facility 9or commercial solar energy facility to adhere to the 10recommendations provided by the Illinois Department of Natural 11Resources in an EcoCAT natural resource review report under 17 12Ill. Adm. Code Part 1075. 13    (p) A county may require a facility owner to:14        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 15    identified by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources 16    and the Illinois Nature Preserve Commission; or17        (2) consider the recommendations of the Illinois 18    Department of Natural Resources for setbacks from 19    protected lands, including areas identified by the 20    Illinois Nature Preserve Commission.21    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide 22evidence of consultation with the Illinois State Historic 23Preservation Office to assess potential impacts on 24State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 25Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act. 26    (r) To maximize community benefits, including, but not   HB1627- 14 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1limited to, reduced stormwater runoff, flooding, and erosion 2at the ground mounted solar energy system, improved soil 3health, and increased foraging habitat for game birds, 4songbirds, and pollinators, a county may (1) require a 5commercial solar energy facility owner to plant, establish, 6and maintain for the life of the facility vegetative ground 7cover, consistent with the goals of the Pollinator-Friendly 8Solar Site Act and (2) require the submittal of a vegetation 9management plan that is in compliance with the agricultural 10impact mitigation agreement in the application to construct 11and operate a commercial solar energy facility in the county 12if the vegetative ground cover and vegetation management plan 13comply with the requirements of the underlying agreement with 14the landowner or landowners where the facility will be 15constructed. 16    No later than 90 days after January 27, 2023 (the 17effective date of Public Act 102-1123), the Illinois 18Department of Natural Resources shall develop guidelines for 19vegetation management plans that may be required under this 20subsection for commercial solar energy facilities. The 21guidelines must include guidance for short-term and long-term 22property management practices that provide and maintain native 23and non-invasive naturalized perennial vegetation to protect 24the health and well-being of pollinators. 25    (r-5) A county may deny a permit for a commercial solar 26energy facility or commercial wind energy facility, including   HB1627- 15 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1the modification or improvement to an existing facility, if 2the work requested to be performed under the permit is not 3being performed under a project labor agreement with building 4trades located in the area where construction, modification, 5or improvements are to be made. 6    (s) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement 7with the Illinois Department of Transportation, a road 8district, or other unit of local government relating to a 9commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 10facility, the road use agreement shall require the facility 11owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 12improving roads used by the facility owner to construct the 13commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy 14facility and (ii) the reasonable cost of repairing roads used 15by the facility owner during construction of the commercial 16wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 17so that those roads are in a condition that is safe for the 18driving public after the completion of the facility's 19construction. Roadways improved in preparation for and during 20the construction of the commercial wind energy facility or 21commercial solar energy facility shall be repaired and 22restored to the improved condition at the reasonable cost of 23the developer if the roadways have degraded or were damaged as 24a result of construction-related activities.25    The road use agreement shall not require the facility 26owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not   HB1627- 16 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of 2the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 3energy facility. Road-related fees, permit fees, or other 4charges imposed by the Illinois Department of Transportation, 5a road district, or other unit of local government under a road 6use agreement with the facility owner shall be reasonably 7related to the cost of administration of the road use 8agreement. 9    (s-5) The facility owner shall also compensate landowners 10for crop losses or other agricultural damages resulting from 11damage to the drainage system caused by the construction of 12the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 13energy facility. The commercial wind energy facility owner or 14commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair or pay for 15the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage system 16caused by the construction of the commercial wind energy 17facility or the commercial solar energy facility in accordance 18with the agriculture impact mitigation agreement requirements 19for repair of drainage. The commercial wind energy facility 20owner or commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair 21or pay for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 22caused by the construction or deconstruction of the commercial 23wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 24as soon as reasonably practicable. 25    (t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a facility 26owner with siting approval from a county to construct a   HB1627- 17 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 2facility is authorized to cross or impact a drainage system, 3including, but not limited to, drainage tiles, open drainage 4ditches, culverts, and water gathering vaults, owned or under 5the control of a drainage district under the Illinois Drainage 6Code without obtaining prior agreement or approval from the 7drainage district in accordance with the farmland drainage 8plan required by subsection (j-5). 9    (u) The amendments to this Section adopted in Public Act 10102-1123 do not apply to: (1) an application for siting 11approval or for a special use permit for a commercial wind 12energy facility or commercial solar energy facility if the 13application was submitted to a unit of local government before 14January 27, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123); 15(2) a commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar 16energy facility if the facility owner has submitted an 17agricultural impact mitigation agreement to the Department of 18Agriculture before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 19Public Act 102-1123); or (3) a commercial wind energy or 20commercial solar energy development on property that is 21located within an enterprise zone certified under the Illinois 22Enterprise Zone Act, that was classified as industrial by the 23appropriate zoning authority on or before January 27, 2023, 24and that is located within 4 miles of the intersection of 25Interstate 88 and Interstate 39. 26(Source: P.A. 102-1123, eff. 1-27-23; 103-81, eff. 6-9-23;   HB1627- 18 -LRB104 08302 RTM 18353 b1103-580, eff. 12-8-23; revised 7-29-24.)